Utah statutes.
16-10a-627.   Restrictions on transfer or registration of shares or other
securities.
(1)  The articles of incorporation, the bylaws, an agreement among
shareholders, or an agreement between one or more shareholders and the
corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of
transfer of shares of the corporation.  A restriction does not affect shares
issued before the restriction was adopted unless the holders of the shares are
parties to the restriction agreement or voted in favor of the restriction or
otherwise consented to the restriction.
(2)  A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is
valid and enforceable against the holder or a transferee of the holder if the
restriction is authorized by this section and its existence is noted
conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate, or if the restriction
is contained in the information statement required by Subsection
16-10a-626(2).  Unless so noted, a restriction is not enforceable against a
person without knowledge of the restriction.
(3)  A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is
authorized:
(a)  to maintain the corporation's status when it is dependent on the number
or identity of its shareholders;
(b)  to preserve entitlements, benefits, or exemptions under federal, state,
or local laws; and
(c)  for any other reasonable purpose.
(4)  A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may:
(a)  obligate the shareholder first to offer to the corporation or other
persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, an opportunity to
acquire the restricted shares;
(b)  obligate the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or
simultaneously, to acquire the restricted shares;
(c)  require, as a condition to a transfer or registration, that any one or
more persons, including the corporation or any of its shareholders, approve
the transfer or registration, if the requirement is not manifestly
unreasonable; or
(d)  prohibit the transfer or the registration of a transfer of the restricted
shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not
manifestly unreasonable.
(5)  The description of the restrictions on the transfer or registration of
transfer of shares in Subsection (4) is not exhaustive.
(6)  For purposes of this section, "shares" includes a security convertible
into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.
